Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2301.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "upstream company" in section 1702-L of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1702-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * * 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Upstream company." The term includes a company that is engaged in the exploration, development, manufacturing, production, processing, refining or transportation of natural gas, clean hydrogen, critical minerals, milk or products used in semiconductor manufacturing, biomedical manufacturing or biomedical research in this Commonwealth.Section 2. Section 1791-L of the act is amended to read:Section 1791-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Qualified project facility." Any of the following:(1) A project facility as defined in section 1711-L.(2) A project facility as defined in section 1731-L.(3) A project facility as defined in section 1751-L.(4) A project facility as defined in section 1771-L.(5) A project facility as defined in section 1793.1-L. "Qualified tax credit recipient." Any of the following who have been awarded a tax credit:(1) A qualified taxpayer as defined in section 1711-L.(2) A qualified taxpayer as defined in section 1731-L.(3) A qualified taxpayer as defined in section 1751-L.(4) A qualified taxpayer as defined in section 1771-L.(5) A qualified taxpayer as defined in section 1793.1-L. Section 3. Article XVII-L of the act is amended by adding a subarticle to read:SUBARTICLE GCRITICAL MINERALS EXTRACTIONSection 1793.1-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle 20260HB2301PN3024 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Critical mineral." A mineral, element, substance or material identified by the United States Department of the Interior, the United States Department of Energy or the United States Geological Survey in accordance with 30 U.S.C. § 1606 (relating to mineral security), which is essential to the economic or national security of the United States, has a supply chain vulnerable to disruption and serves an essential function in the production, storage or transmission of energy, defense systems or advanced technologies."Produced water." Water, brine or wastewater of any kind generated at a conventional or unconventional oil or gas well site."Project facility." A facility located in this Commonwealth that extracts a critical mineral from produced water and meets any of the following criteria:(1) Required a capital investment of at least $1,000,000 to construct and place into service.(2) Required a capital investment of at least $1,000,000 to expand or renovate an existing facility in this Commonwealth for the purpose of enabling the extraction of a critical mineral from produced water."Qualified taxpayer." A company that satisfies all of the following requirements:(1) Obtains and uses produced water generated in this Commonwealth to extract a critical mineral at a project facility located in this Commonwealth that is placed in service on or after the effective date of this section.(2) Has made a capital investment of at least $1,000,000 20260HB2301PN3024 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to construct and place the project facility into service in this Commonwealth.(3) Has made good faith efforts to recruit and employ, and to encourage contractors and subcontractors to recruit and employ, workers from the local labor market for employment during the construction or expansion of the project facility.(4) Ensures that construction work to place the project facility into service is performed in compliance with the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products Procurement Act . Section 1793.2-L. Eligibility.To be eligible to receive a tax credit under this subarticle, a company shall demonstrate all of the following to the department:(1) The company meets the requirements of a qualified taxpayer.(2) The company has filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years and has paid any balance of State tax due as determined by assessment or determination of the department and not subject to a timely appeal.Section 1793.3-L. Application and approval of tax credit.(a) Application.--(1) A qualified taxpayer may apply to the department for a tax credit under this subarticle.(2) The application must be submitted to the department by March 1 for a tax credit based on the use of produced water for the extraction of a critical mineral at a project facility during the prior calendar year.20260HB2301PN3024 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The application shall be submitted on a form determined by the department and shall include all of the following:(i) Documentation sufficient to demonstrate the extraction of a critical mineral from produced water at the project facility.(ii) Information necessary to verify that the applicant is a qualified taxpayer.(iii) Any other information the department deems necessary to administer the tax credit.(b) Review and approval.--(1) The department shall review each application submitted under this section and issue a written notice of approval or disapproval no later than May 1.(2) If the application is approved, the department shall issue a certificate to the qualified taxpayer stating the amount of the tax credit granted for the prior calendar year.(c) Availability of tax credits.--(1) The total amount of tax credits available under this subarticle shall not exceed $25,000,000 in a fiscal year.(2) A qualified taxpayer may not receive more than $5,000,000 in tax credits in any fiscal year.(d) Rate of tax credit.--(1) A qualified taxpayer approved under this subarticle shall be eligible to receive a tax credit equal to $20 for each kilogram of the aggregate total of qualifying critical minerals extracted from produced water at a project facility located in this Commonwealth during the prior calendar year, subject to the limitation in subsection (c)(2).(2) The aggregate total shall include the combined 20260HB2301PN3024 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 weight, in kilograms, of all qualifying critical minerals extracted from produced water, as verified through production documentation submitted with the application.(3) The tax credit shall be calculated based on the total combined weight of all qualifying critical minerals extracted at the project facility, and not on a per-element basis.Section 1793.4-L. Use of tax credits.(a) Initial use.-- Before selling or assigning a tax credit under section 1793.6-L, a qualified taxpayer shall first apply the tax credit against the qualified tax liability incurred in the taxable year for which the credit was approved or in any of the four taxable years immediately following that year.(b) Application to liability.-- A tax credit under this subarticle may be applied against up to 20% of the qualified taxpayer's qualified tax liability incurred in the taxable year for which the credit was approved or in any of the four succeeding taxable years.(c) Limitation.-- A qualified taxpayer that receives a tax credit under this subarticle shall not be eligible to receive any other tax credit provided under this act.Section 1793.5-L. Carryback and refund.A tax credit awarded under this subarticle may not be carried back or applied for the purpose of obtaining a refund.Section 1793.6-L. Sale or assignment.(a) Authorization.-- A qualified taxpayer that retains a tax credit through the end of the calendar year in which the credit was approved may sell or assign the tax credit, in whole or in part, if the sale or assignment is completed no later than the end of the fifth calendar year following the year in which the 20260HB2301PN3024 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 credit was approved.(b) Application.--(1) To sell or assign a tax credit under this section, a qualified taxpayer shall file an application with the department on a form specified by the department.(2) The department shall approve the application if the department receives all of the following:(i) A determination by the department that the applicant has:(A) filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years; and(B) paid all outstanding State tax liabilities not subject to a timely appeal, as determined by assessment or other determination of the department.(ii) If the proposed sale or assignment is to a company that is not an upstream company or downstream company, a certification from the qualified taxpayer that the taxpayer has offered to sell or assign the tax credit:(A) exclusively to a downstream company for a period of 30 days following the approval of the credit under section 1793.3-L; and(B) to an upstream company or downstream company for a period of 30 days following the expiration of the period under clause (A).(c) Approval.-- Upon approval of the application under subsection (b), the qualified taxpayer may sell or assign the tax credit, in whole or in part.Section 1793.7-L. Purchasers and assignees.(a) Time for use.-- A purchaser or assignee of a tax credit 20260HB2301PN3024 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under section 1793.6-L shall claim the credit in the calendar year in which the purchase or assignment occurs.(b) Limitation on use.-- The amount of the credit a purchaser or assignee may apply against qualified tax liabilities in a taxable year shall not exceed 50% of the purchaser's or assignee's total qualified tax liability for that year.(c) Restriction on resale or reassignment.--(1) A purchaser of a tax credit under section 1793.6-L may not sell or assign the purchased credit.(2) An assignee of a tax credit under section 1793.6-L may not sell or assign the assigned credit.(d) Notice requirement.-- A purchaser or assignee shall notify the department of the identity of the seller or assignor in accordance with procedures established by the department.Section 1793.8-L. Pass-through entity.(a) Election.-- A pass-through entity with an unused tax credit under this subarticle may elect, in writing and in accordance with procedures established by the department, to transfer all or a portion of the credit to the pass-through entity's shareholders, members or partners in proportion to the share of the entity's distributive income to which each is entitled.(b) Double use prohibited.-- A tax credit transferred under subsection (a) may not be claimed by both:(1) the pass-through entity; and(2) a shareholder, member or partner of the pass-through entity.(c) Limitation on use.-- A transferee under subsection (a) may not apply more than 20% of the credit against the transferee's qualified tax liability for any taxable year.20260HB2301PN3024 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Time for use.-- A transferee under subsection (a) shall claim the tax credit in the calendar year in which the transfer is made.(e) Resale and assignment prohibited.-- A transferee under subsection (a) may not sell or assign the tax credit.Section 1793.9-L. Administration.(a) Audits and assessments.--(1) The department may conduct an audit of any taxpayer awarded a tax credit under this subarticle to verify the validity of the credit awarded.(2) If the department determines that a tax credit was improperly issued, the department may issue an assessment against the taxpayer. The procedures for issuance, collection, enforcement and appeal of an assessment under this section shall be governed by Article II.(b) Guidelines and regulations.-- The department shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this subarticle. The guidelines shall remain in effect until the department promulgates regulations to implement the provisions of this subarticle.Section 1794.1-L. Reports to the General Assembly.(a) Annual report.-- Beginning in the year following the first award of tax credits under this subarticle, and by October 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report on the tax credit under this subarticle to all of the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the 20260HB2301PN3024 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Finance Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Finance Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Contents.--The report shall include the following information as of the date of the report:(1) The names of all qualified taxpayers utilizing tax credits under this subarticle.(2) The amount of tax credits approved for, utilized by or sold or assigned by each qualified taxpayer.(c) Reconciliation report.-- By May 1 of the year that is 10 years after the year in which tax credits are first awarded under this subarticle, the department shall submit a reconciliation report on the effectiveness of the tax credit program to the Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives. The report shall include, to the extent available, the following information covering the preceding 10 years:(1) The name and business address of each qualified taxpayer granted tax credits under this subarticle.(2) The total amount of tax credits granted to each qualified taxpayer.(3) The total number of jobs created by qualified taxpayers, upstream companies, downstream companies and any other companies providing goods, utilities or services supporting their business operations, including average annual salary and hourly wage information.(4) The amount of tax paid under Article II by the entities listed under paragraph (3).(5) The amount of tax withheld from employees or paid by members, partners or shareholders under Article III of the 20260HB2301PN3024 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entities listed under paragraph (3).(6) The amount of tax paid under Article IV by the entities listed under paragraph (3).(7) The amount of tax paid under Article XI by the entities listed under paragraph (3).(8) The amount of any other State or local taxes paid by the entities listed under paragraph (3).(9) Any other information relevant to the economic impact of this subarticle on this Commonwealth.(d) Recommendation for changes.-- If the reconciliation report required under subsection (c) shows that the total amount of tax credits granted under this subarticle exceeds the total amount of tax revenue reported under subsection (c)(4), (5), (6), (7), (8) and (9), the department shall include in the report any recommendations for changes to the calculation or administration of the tax credit.(e) Public access.-- The reports required under this section shall be public records as defined in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law , and shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The reports may not include confidential proprietary information as defined in section 102 of the Right- to-Know Law . Section 1794.2-L. Applicability.This subarticle shall apply to the use of produced water from within this Commonwealth during the period beginning January 1, 2027, and ending December 31, 2039.Section 1794.3-L. Expiration.The authority of the department to accept applications for tax credits under this article shall expire December 31, 2040.20260HB2301PN3024 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2301PN3024 - 12 - 1